src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! Verb inflection
! ---------------
!! The VOTIC language verbs inflect in persons.

LEXICON V_
+V: # ;

LEXICON Persons
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>n   K   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>t   K   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:    K  ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>mme  K   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>tte  K   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:  K   ;
+V+Inf:    K   ;
+V+Der/min+N:min   NMN_   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
